Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3806
(UTC 106) Common law of trusts; principles of equity.

(UTC 106) The common law of trusts and principles of equity supplement the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, except to the extent modified by the code or another statute of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 6.

The right of retainer of a distribution is a valid, equitable remedy available to trustees of trusts. In re Trust of Hrnicek, 280 Neb. 898, 792 N.W.2d 143 (2010).